Utah statutes.
26-2-18.   Interments -- Duties of sexton or person in charge -- Record of
interments -- Information filed with local registrar.
(1) (a)  A sexton or person in charge of any premises in which interments are
made may not inter or permit the interment of any dead body or dead fetus
unless the interment is made by a funeral service director or by a person
holding a burial-transit permit.
(b)  The right and duty to control the disposition of a deceased person shall
be governed by Sections 58-9-601 through 58-9-604.
(2) (a)  The sexton or the person in charge of any premises where interments
are made shall keep a record of all interments made in the premises under his
charge, stating the name of the decedent, place of death, date of burial, and
name and address of the funeral service director or other person making the
interment.
(b)  The record described in this Subsection (2) shall be open to public
inspection.
(c)  A city or county clerk may, at the clerk's option, maintain the interment
records described in this Subsection (2) on behalf of the sexton or person in
charge of any premises in which interments are made.
(3) (a)  Not later than the tenth day of each month, the sexton, person in
charge of the premises, or city or county clerk who maintains the interment
records shall send to the local registrar and the department a list of all
interments made in the premises during the preceding month.
(b)  The list described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be in the form prescribed
by the state registrar.
